Maine, session 132, LD709.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §7308, as amended by PL 2001, c. 487, §1, is repealed and the
following enacted in its place:
§7308. Respite for ME Program
The Respite for ME Program is established in the department. The department shall
administer the Respite for ME Program for the purpose of providing respite care, as
described in the federal Older Americans Act of 1965, 42 United States Code, Section
3030s-1(b)(4), and supplemental services, as described in 42 United States Code, Section
3030s-1(b)(5), for family caregivers as defined in 42 United States Code, Section 3022(3)
and older relative caregivers as defined in 42 United States Code, Section 3030s(a)(4).
Page 1 - 132LR0265(02)